apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="tro__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inder</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andt</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Modal verbs -->

    <pardef n="k/unne__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnet</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ulle__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ullet</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="må/tte__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttet</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- =============================================================== -->
    <!--                      U N C H E C K E D                          -->
    <!-- =============================================================== -->

    <pardef n="ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="croupier__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="brud__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alt/er__n">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tro"><i>tro</i><par n="tro__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finde"><i>f</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vinde"><i>v</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svinde"><i>sv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forsvinde"><i>forsv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunne"><i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="måtte"><i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="skulle"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="ville"><i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vbmod"/></e>
